Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RULEMAKING; EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of employment and economic development must adopt rules allowing individuals on a medical assistance waiver, regardless of the waiver service the individual is receiving, to receive extended employment services through the extended employment program. Participation in the extended employment program may be conditioned on the submission of a form, developed by the commissioner, that documents that the individual is receiving separate services from each program and that no services are being reimbursed by more than one program. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of employment and economic development must adopt rules repealing Minnesota Rules, part 3300.6005, subpart 1, item B. new text end